id_rules
// Tested on espeak-1.46.02 ( Ubuntu 12.04 )
// This file is UTF8 encode 
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Indonesian
.group a
        a        a
     a) a        _|a
    A_) a        _|a
    au) a        _|a
        ai       aI
        au       aU
// english:
        able (_        _^_EN
        ables (_        _^_EN
        abled (_        _^_EN
        abling (_        _^_EN
        ac (_        _^_EN
        acs (_        _^_EN
        age (_        _^_EN
        ages (_        _^_EN
        aged (_        _^_EN
        ary (_        _^_EN
        aries (_        _^_EN
        aried (_        _^_EN
        arying (_        _^_EN
        arry (_        _^_EN
        arries (_        _^_EN
        arried (_        _^_EN
        arrying        (_        _^_EN
//        al (_        _^_EN
        ance (_        _^_EN
        anced (_        _^_EN
        ancy (_        _^_EN
        ancies (_        _^_EN
//        anda (_        _^_EN
//        andum (_        _^_EN
        ant (_        _^_EN
        anted (_        _^_EN
//        ar (_        _^_EN
        archy (_        _^_EN
        archies (_        _^_EN
        ase (_        _^_EN
        ases (_        _^_EN
        ased (_        _^_EN
        asm (_        _^_EN
        asms (_        _^_EN
        ate (_        _^_EN
        ates (_        _^_EN
        ated (_        _^_EN
        ation (_        _^_EN
        ations (_        _^_EN
        ational (_        _^_EN
//        al (_        _^_EN
.group b
        b        b
     _) be (@@   b@
     _) be (@P2  b@
        be (bas  b'E
        be (sar  b@
        be (san  b'E
     _) ber (@P3 b@R
        be (n    b@
    s@) be       b@
    s@) bel (@   b@l
    s@) bel (_   b@l
// english:
        ble (_        _^_EN
        bled (_        _^_EN
        bles (_        _^_EN
        bling (_        _^_EN
.group c
        c        tS
        ce       tS@
        ch       X
// english:
        cy (_        _^_EN
        cies (_        _^_EN
        cied (_        _^_EN
        ch (_        _^_EN
        ches (_        _^_EN
        ched (_        _^_EN
        ching (_        _^_EN
.group d
        d        d
     _) de       d@
        de (ks   d'E
        de (ka   d'E
        de (kap  d@
   mer) de (ka   d'E
     _) de (mo   dE
        den (_   d'En
        dj       dZ     / Dutch
.group e
        e        E
    Ce) e        E
     e) e        _|E
    A_) e        _|E
        e (_     E
     _) e (ngga  @
        eh (_    Eh
        en (_    En
  meng) e        E
  meng) e  (l    @
  meng) e  (lo   E
  meng) em       '@m
  meng) e  (r    @

  
// english:
        eak        (_        _^_EN
        eaks        (_        _^_EN
        eaked        (_        _^_EN
        eaker        (_        _^_EN
        eaking        (_        _^_EN
        eakers        (_        _^_EN
        ence (_        _^_EN
        ency (_        _^_EN
        ences (_        _^_EN
        encies (_        _^_EN
        end (_        _^_EN
        ends (_        _^_EN
        ending (_        _^_EN
        ended (_        _^_EN
        endum (_        _^_EN
        ess (_        _^_EN
        esses (_        _^_EN
        essed (_        _^_EN
        essful (_        _^_EN
        essy (_        _^_EN
//        et (_        _^_EN
        ette (_        _^_EN
.group f
        f        f
        fes (@   f'Es
     _) fes (@   f'Es
        ff       f
// english:
        fication (_        _^_EN
        fications (_        _^_EN
        fic (_        _^_EN
        fics (_        _^_EN
        fying (_        _^_EN
        fied (_        _^_EN
.group g
        g        g
        ge       g@
.group h
        h        h
.group i
        i        i
        ie       i
     i) i        _|i
    A_) i        _|i
// english:
        ic (_        _^_EN
        ics (_        _^_EN
        iced (_        _^_EN
        ices (_        _^_EN
        icies (_        _^_EN
        ique (_        _^_EN
        iques (_        _^_EN
        ical (_        _^_EN
        icle (_        _^_EN
        icles (_        _^_EN
//        id (_        _^_EN
        ide (_        _^_EN
        ides (_        _^_EN
        ided (_        _^_EN
        iding (_        _^_EN
        ive (_        _^_EN
        ives (_        _^_EN
        ile (_        _^_EN
//        ie (_        _^_EN
        ite (_        _^_EN
        ites (_        _^_EN
        ited (_        _^_EN
//        in (_        _^_EN
        ine (_        _^_EN
        ines (_        _^_EN
        ined (_        _^_EN
        ization (_        _^_EN
        izations (_        _^_EN
        ism (_        _^_EN
        isms (_        _^_EN
        ist (_        _^_EN
        ists (_        _^_EN
        isted (_        _^_EN
        isting (_        _^_EN
        ity (_        _^_EN
        ities (_        _^_EN
        itied (_        _^_EN
        ise (_        _^_EN
        ises (_        _^_EN
        ised (_        _^_EN
        
.group j
        j        dZ
        je       dZ@
.group k
        k        k
        k (_     k
        kh       x
        ke       k@
     _) kee      k@;'E
        kre      k'RE
     _) ke (@P2  k@
//     _) ke (@@   k@
        ke (n    k@
.group l
        l        l
        leh (_   l'Eh
        ll       l
// english:
        logy (_        _^_EN
        logue (_        _^_EN
        lysis (_        _^_EN
.group m
        m        m
     _) me (@@   m@
     _) me (ja   mE
     _) men (@P3 m@n
     _) meng (@P4 m@N
     _) mengem (@ m@N@m
     _) mengenakkan m@N;'Enakkan
     _) menger (@ m@N@R
     _) mengel (a m@NEl
     _) mengel (o m@N@l
     _) mengel (ok m@N;|El
     _) mengel (u m@N;|@l
     _) mempe (@    m@mp@
.group n
        n        n
        ne (t    nE
        ne (r    n@
   me)  ner      n@R
        ng       N
        ny       n^
        nyen     n^En
        nye      n^@
.group o
        o        o
     o) o        _|o
    A_) o        _|o
        o (r     O
        oe       u        // Dutch spelling
// english:
        ose (_        _^_EN
//        or (_        _^_EN
        old (_        _^_EN
        ous (_        _^_EN
        ote (_        _^_EN
        ource (_        _^_EN
        ources (_        _^_EN
        ourced (_        _^_EN
        ourcing (_        _^_EN
.group p
        p        p
        pp       p
        ph       f
        pe       p@
     _) peme     p@m@
     _) pe (@@   p@
   rem) pet      pEt
   rem) pet (_   pEt
// english:
        py (_        _^_EN
.group q
        q        k
        qu       kw
.group r
        r        R2
        r (K     R
     e) r (K     R
        rd (_        _^_EN
        rem (pet REm
.group s
        s        s
        ss       s
        sy       C   // perhaps [S;] ??
        sj       C
     _) se (P2   s@
     _) se (CP2  s@
     _) se (@@   s@
        se (pak  sE
// english:
//        sis (_        _^_EN
        st (_        _^_EN
        sm (_        _^_EN
        sh (_        _^_EN
.group t
        t        t
        tel (a   t@l
     _) te       t@
     _) te (ks   tE
     _) ter (CP3 t@R
     _) ter (ong tER
     _) ter (or  tER
     _) ter (oris tER
        tj       tS      // Dutch
     _) tel      t@l
     _) ter (@@  t@R
// english:
        tion (_        _^_EN
        ty (_        _^_EN
        tre (_        _^_EN
.group u
        u        u
     u) u        _|u
    A_) u        _|u
// english:
        ure (_        _^_EN
.group v
        v        v
.group w
        w        w
.group x
        x        ks
     _) x        z
.group y
        y        j
// english:
//        y (_        _^_EN
.group z
        z        z
.group
        $        dOlaR
    __) - (_D    t,andak'uR2aN
        *        b'intaN
     *) * (*
        ** 
    **) * (_         _::
